Utah statutes.
58-64-501.   Unlawful conduct.
"Unlawful conduct" includes:
(1)  a licensee conducting a deception detection examination:
(a)  outside of the physical presence of the subject of the examination;
(b)  on the subject of the examination by use of any electronic means,
including the telephone; and
(c)  through any surreptitious means when the subject of the examination is
not aware of the examination; and
(2)  conducting a deception detection examination if the individual performing
the deception detection examinations is located outside of the state and
performs a deception detection examination by any electronic means upon a
person located within the state.
